Tennessee statutes. Title 24 Evidence and Witnesses
Part 2

Judicial Notice

24-6-201. Judicial notice of foreign law in appellate court.

It is not necessary, in a case carried from an inferior to an appellate court, to have the statutes of a state read as evidence in the inferior court, transcribed into the record, except where it is directed to be done by the inferior court; but the appellate court may take judicial notice of such laws and statutes.

Code 1858, § 3801 (deriv. Acts 1839-1840, ch. 45, § 1); Shan., § 5586; mod. Code 1932, § 9767; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-613; T.C.A. §24-6-207.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from former §24-6-207 to §24-6-201 by authority of the Code Commission in 2017.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Foreign Laws, § 3.

Law Reviews.

Evidence — Judicial Notice in Tennessee, 13 Tenn. L. Rev. 54.

Judicial Notice — Courts of the One State Do Not Judicially Notice the Laws of Another, 10 Tenn. L. Rev. 306.

Judicial Notice in Tennessee (Robert Banks, Jr. and Elizabeth T. Collins), 21 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 431 (1991).

24-6-105. Officer's duty to give copies of records.